Indiana, session 2026, SB216.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 32-24-1-0.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 0.1. The amendments made to sections 7
and 9 of this chapter during the 2026 regular session of the general
assembly apply to condemnation proceedings filed after March 31,
2026.
SECTION 2. IC 32-24-1-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.152-2021,
SECTION 32, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 7. (a) The notice, upon its return, must show
its:
(1) service for ten (10) days; or
(2) proof of publication for three (3) successive weeks:
(A) with each publication of the notice in a weekly newspaper
of general circulation printed and published in the English
language in the county in which the property sought to be
acquired is located; or
(B) with the first publication of notice in a newspaper
SB 216—LS 6928/DI 129


described in clause (A) and the two (2) subsequent
publications of notice:
(i) in accordance with IC 5-3-5; and
(ii) on the official web site website of the county.
The last publication of the notice must be five (5) days before the day
set for the hearing.
(b) The clerk of the court in which the proceedings are pending,
upon the first publication of the notice, shall send to the post office
address of each nonresident owner whose property will be affected by
the proceedings a copy of the notice, if the post office address of the
owner or owners can be ascertained by inquiry at the office of the
treasurer of the county.
(c) This subsection only applies to a unit under IC 36-1-8-20.5.
An owner (as defined in IC 32-24-2.6-3) shall notify the court of the
owner's intent to claim compensation for loss of a going concern
under IC 32-24-2.6 not later than ninety (90) days after the date of:
(1) the first service; or
(2) publication;
of the notice under subsection (a).
(c) (d) The court, being satisfied of the regularity of the proceedings
and the right of the plaintiff to exercise the power of eminent domain
for the use sought, shall appoint:
(1) one (1) disinterested freeholder of the county; and
(2) two (2) disinterested appraisers licensed under IC 25-34.1;
who are residents of Indiana to assess the damages, or the benefits and
damages, as the case may be, that the owner or owners severally may
sustain, or be entitled to, by reason of the acquisition. One (1) of the
appraisers appointed under subdivision (2) must reside not more than
fifty (50) miles from the property.
(e) If an owner notifies the court under subsection (c), at least
one (1) appraiser appointed under subsection (d)(2) must be
qualified and capable of determining the loss of a going concern.
SECTION 3. IC 32-24-1-9 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 9. (a) Each
appraiser shall take an oath that:
(1) the appraiser has no interest in the matter; and
(2) the appraiser will honestly and impartially make the
assessment.
(b) After the appraisers are sworn as provided in subsection (a), the
judge shall instruct the appraisers as to:
(1) their duties as appraisers; and
(2) the measure of the damages and benefits, if any, they allow.
SB 216—LS 6928/DI 129


(c) The appraisers shall determine and report all of the following:
(1) The fair market value of each parcel of property sought to be
acquired and the value of each separate estate or interest in the
property.
(2) The fair market value of all improvements pertaining to the
property, if any, on the portion of the property to be acquired.
(3) The damages, if any, to the residue of the property of the
owner or owners caused by taking out the part sought to be
acquired.
(4) The other damages, if any, that will result to any persons from
the construction of the improvements in the manner proposed by
the plaintiff.
(5) This subdivision only applies to a unit under
IC 36-1-8-20.5. The damages, if any, to an owner's loss of a
going concern under IC 32-24-2.6, if the owner (as defined in
IC 32-24-2.6-3) has notified the court in accordance with
section 7(c) of this chapter.
(d) If the property is sought to be acquired by the state or by a
county for a public highway or a municipal corporation for a public use
that confers benefits on any property of the owner, the report must also
state the benefits that will accrue to each parcel of property, set
opposite the description of each parcel of property whether described
in the complaint or not.
(e) Except as provided in subsection (f), in estimating the damages
specified in subsection (c), the appraisers may not deduct for any
benefits that may result from the improvement.
(f) In the case of a condemnation by the state or by a county for a
public highway or a municipal corporation for public use, the
appraisers shall deduct any benefits assessed from the amount of
damage allowed, if any, under subsection (c)(3) and (c)(4) and the
difference, if any, plus the damages allowed under subsection (c)(1),
and (c)(2), and, if applicable, (c)(5) shall be the amount of the award.
However, the damages awarded may not be less than the damages
allowed under subsection (c)(1), and (c)(2), and, if applicable, (c)(5).
Upon the trial of exceptions to the award by either party, a like measure
of damages must be followed.
(g) For the purpose of assessing compensation and damages, the
right to compensation and damages is considered to have accrued as of
the date of the service of the notice provided in section 6 of this
chapter, and actual value of compensation and damages at that date
shall be:
(1) the measure of compensation for all property to be actually
SB 216—LS 6928/DI 129


acquired; and
(2) the basis of damages to property not actually acquired but
injuriously affected;
except as to the damages stated in subsection (c)(4).
SECTION 4. IC 32-24-2-0.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 0.1. The amendments made to sections 5
and 6 of this chapter during the 2026 regular session of the general
assembly apply to proceedings under this chapter commenced after
March 31, 2026.
SECTION 5. IC 32-24-2-5 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 5. (a) Except as
provided in subsection (b), if:
(1) a municipality has the power to acquire property under this
chapter; or
(2) another statute provides for proceedings by a municipality for
acquiring property under this chapter;
the board exercising those powers may proceed under IC 32-24-1
instead of this chapter.
(b) This subsection only applies to a unit under IC 36-1-8-20.5.
If an owner (as defined in IC 32-24-2.6-3) notifies the board of the
owner's intent to claim compensation for loss of a going concern
under IC 32-24-2.6, the board exercising those powers must
proceed under IC 32-24-1 to acquire the property.
SECTION 6. IC 32-24-2-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.152-2021,
SECTION 33, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 6. (a) This chapter applies if the works board
of a municipality wants to acquire property for the use of the
municipality or to open, change, lay out, or vacate a street, an alley, or
a public place in the municipality, including a proposed street or alley
crossings of railways or other rights-of-way. However, this chapter
does not apply if a municipality wants to acquire the property of a
public utility (as defined in IC 8-1-2-1).
(b) The works board must adopt a resolution that the municipality
wants to acquire the property. The resolution must describe the
property that may be injuriously or beneficially affected. The board
shall have notice of the resolution:
(1) published for two (2) consecutive weeks:
(A) with each publication of notice in a newspaper of general
circulation published in the municipality; or
(B) with the first publication of notice in a newspaper
described in clause (A) and the second publication of notice:
SB 216—LS 6928/DI 129


(i) in accordance with IC 5-3-5; and
(ii) on the official web site website of the municipality; and
(2) mailed to the owner of each piece of property affected by the
proposed acquisition.
The notice must name a date, at least thirty (30) forty-five (45) days
after the last publication, at which time the board will receive or hear
remonstrances from persons interested in or affected by the proceeding.
(c) The works board shall consider the remonstrances, if any, and
then take final action, confirming, modifying, or rescinding its original
resolution.
(d) This subsection only applies to a unit under IC 36-1-8-20.5.
If an owner (as defined in IC 32-24-2.6-3) submits a remonstrance
that notifies the works board of the owner's intent to claim
compensation for loss of a going concern under IC 32-24-2.6, the
works board must terminate proceedings under this chapter and
proceed under IC 32-24-1 to acquire the property.
SECTION 7. IC 32-24-2.6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]:
Chapter 2.6. Compensation for Business Losses
Sec. 1. This chapter applies only to condemnation proceedings
filed after March 31, 2026. This chapter only applies to a unit
under IC 36-1-8-20.5.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "going concern" means the
benefits that accrue to a business or trade as a result of the
business's or trade's:
(1) location;
(2) geographic features;
(3) reputation for dependability;
(4) skill or quality;
(5) customer base; or
(6) good will;
or any other circumstances resulting in the probable retention of
old or acquisition of new patronage.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "owner" means:
(1) the persons listed on the tax assessment rolls as being
responsible for the payment of real estate taxes imposed on
the property;
(2) the persons in whose name title to real estate is shown in
the records of the recorder of the county in which the real
estate is located; or
(3) a lessee who operates a business on the real property.
SB 216—LS 6928/DI 129


Sec. 4. If a business or trade is damaged by a taking,
condemnation, or eminent domain proceeding, the owner shall be
compensated by the condemnor for the loss of the going concern,
unless the condemnor establishes by a preponderance of the
evidence that:
(1) the loss is not caused by the taking of the property or the
injury to the remainder;
(2) the loss can be reasonably prevented by:
(A) relocating the business or trade to:
(i) the same or a similar location; and
(ii) a reasonably suitable location;
as the property that was taken; or
(B) taking steps and adopting procedures that a reasonably
prudent person:
(i) of a similar age; and
(ii) as the owner, under similar conditions;
would take and adopt in preserving the going concern of
the business or trade; or
(3) compensation for the loss will be duplicated in the
compensation otherwise awarded to the owner.
Sec. 5. An owner's damages for loss of value to a going concern
shall be determined by appraisers as part of the compensation due
to the owner. An owner shall provide an appraiser reasonable
access to the records necessary to determine the value of the loss of
the going concern. The appraiser's decision regarding any award
for the loss of the going concern may be challenged by any party.
SECTION 8. IC 36-1-8-20.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 20.5. (a) This section applies after March
31, 2026.
(b) If a unit provides a forgivable loan to a person, the unit must
require, as a condition of providing a forgivable loan, that an
owner (as defined in IC 32-24-2.6-3) of a business may be entitled
to compensation for loss of a going concern under IC 32-24-2.6.
SECTION 9. An emergency is declared for this act.
SB 216—LS 6928/DI 129


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Local Government, to
which was referred Senate Bill No. 216, has had the same under
consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the Senate with
the recommendation that said bill be AMENDED as follows:
Page 2, line 13, after "(c)" insert "This subsection only applies to
a unit under IC 36-1-8-20.5.".
Page 2, line 29, delete "If an owner notifies the court".
Page 2, delete lines 30 through 32, begin a new paragraph and
insert:
"(e) If an owner notifies the court under subsection (c), at least
one (1) appraiser appointed under subsection (d)(2) must be
qualified and capable of determining the loss of a going concern.".
Page 3, line 13, after "(5)" insert "This subdivision only applies to
a unit under IC 36-1-8-20.5.".
Page 4, line 19, after "(b)" insert "This subsection only applies to
a unit under IC 36-1-8-20.5.".
Page 5, line 9, after "(d)" insert "This subsection only applies to a
unit under IC 36-1-8-20.5.".
Page 5, line 19, after "March 31, 2026." insert "This chapter only
applies to a unit under IC 36-1-8-20.5.".
and when so amended that said bill do pass and be reassigned to the
Senate Committee on Appropriations.
(Reference is to SB 216 as introduced.)
BUCK, Chairperson
Committee Vote: Yeas 9, Nays 1.
SB 216—LS 6928/DI 129